Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,109
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission; creation; members; appointment; salary.

(1) For purposes of providing the necessary registration and regulation of persons that possess, manufacture, distribute, deliver, and dispense cannabis for medical purposes pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission is created.

(2) The commission shall consist of no fewer than three and no more than five members.

(3) The three members of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission shall be ex officio members of the commission, serving terms and receiving appointment in the same manner as provided in section 53-105.

(4) The Governor may appoint two additional members, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members elected to the Legislature, to serve with the members of the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission as members of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission. The members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall serve six-year terms.

(5) The Governor may reappoint members of the commission, subject to approval by a majority of the members elected to the Legislature.

(6) Each member of the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Commission shall receive an annual salary of twelve thousand five hundred dollars. Such salary shall be paid in equal installments.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB1235, § 6.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission, see section 53-105.